Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-414.07
Controlled substances; chemical analysis; admissible as evidence
in preliminary hearing.

Whenever matter is submitted
to the criminalistics laboratory of the Nebraska State Patrol for chemical
analysis to determine if the matter is, or contains, a controlled substance,
the report of that analysis shall be admissible in any preliminary hearing
in any court in Nebraska as prima facie evidence of the identity, nature,
and quantity of the matter analyzed. Nothing in this section is intended to
require the use of a laboratory report in a preliminary hearing or to prohibit
the use of other evidence, including circumstantial evidence, in the preliminary
hearing to establish the identity, nature, and quantity of a controlled substance.

Laws 1976, LB 487, § 1;

R.R.S.1943, § 28-4,135.01, (1975);

Laws 1984, LB 403, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 28-1439;

Laws 2014, LB811, § 13.